Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.580

Distinguished professorship trust fund program—Name of professorship—Duties of institution—Use of endowment proceeds.

The professorship is the property of the institution and may be named in honor of a donor, benefactor, or honoree of the institution, at the option of the institution. Once state matching funds are released to a local endowment fund, an institution may combine two professorships to support one professorship holder.

The institution is responsible for soliciting private donations, investing and maintaining all endowment funds, administering the professorship, and reporting on the program to the governor and the legislature upon request. The institution may augment the endowment fund with additional private donations. The principal of the invested endowment fund shall not be invaded.

The proceeds from the endowment fund may be used to supplement the salary of the holder of the professorship, to pay salaries for his or her assistants, and to pay expenses associated with the holder's scholarly work.

[ 1989 c 187 s 2; 1987 c 8 s 6. Formerly RCW 28B.10.871.]